Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3603
Behavioral awareness point of contact; designation; training; duties; registry of local mental health and counseling resources; school district; maintain or have access.

(1) Each school district shall designate one or more school employees as a behavioral awareness point of contact for each school building or other division as determined by such school district. Each behavioral awareness point of contact shall be trained in behavioral awareness and shall have knowledge of community service providers and other resources that are available for the students and families in such school district. The length of such training shall be a reasonable amount as determined by the school board.

(2) Each school district shall maintain or have access to a registry of local mental health and counseling resources. The registry shall include resource services that can be accessed by families and individuals outside of school. Each behavioral awareness point of contact shall coordinate access to support services for students whenever possible. Except as provided in section 43-2101, if information for an external support service is provided to an individual student, school personnel shall notify a parent or guardian of such student in writing unless such recommendation involves law enforcement or child protective services. Each school district shall indicate each behavioral awareness point of contact for such school district on the website of the school district and in any school directory for the school that the behavioral awareness point of contact serves.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 94.
July 19, 2024